Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2153.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 302 of the act of June 27, 2006 (1st Sp.Sess., P.L.1873, No.1), known as the Taxpayer Relief Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 302. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *1234567891011121314151617181920212223 "Data center." A facility primarily used for storage, management and processing of digital data related to the functioning of artificial intelligence or artificial-intelligence-powered language models. A facility shall not be considered a data center unless the facility is used to house all of the following:(1) Computer and network systems, including associated components such as servers, network equipment and appliances, telecommunications and data storage systems.(2) Data communications connections.(3) Equipment used for the transformation, transmission, distribution or management of at least one megawatt of capacity of electrical power and cooling, including substations, uninterruptible power supply systems, all electrical plant equipment and associated air handlers.(4) Internet-related and artificial-intelligence-related equipment and services.* * *Section 2. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 334.1. Disposition of data center property tax revenue.(a) First fiscal year.--In the first fiscal year that unabated property taxes are fully imposed on data centers located within a school district, all revenue received by the school district that is directly attributable to the imposition of property taxes on data centers shall be used to fund exclusions for homestead and farmstead properties.(b) Subsequent fiscal years.--In the second fiscal year and each fiscal year thereafter, an amount equivalent to the revenue directly attributable to the imposition of property taxes on data centers in the first full fiscal year in which property 20260HB2153PN2780 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 taxes are levied and collected shall be used to fund exclusions for homestead and farmstead properties.(c) Prior years.--If, prior to the effective date of this subsection, a school district has imposed property taxes on data centers for one or more full fiscal years, the first full fiscal year after the effective date of this subsection shall be considered the first fiscal year for the purposes of this section. A school district may not be required to contribute funds for property tax revenue collected from taxes imposed on data centers in fiscal years prior to the effective date of this subsection.Section 3. Section 343(a) of the act is amended to read:Section 343. School district tax notices.(a) Tax notice.--A school district that implements homestead and farmstead exclusions shall itemize the homestead and farmstead exclusion on tax bills sent to homestead and farmstead owners, indicating the original amount of tax liability, the amount of the exclusion and the net amount of tax due after the exclusion is applied. If a school district contributes funds under section 334.1, the amount contributed and the amount of exclusion granted under section 334.1 shall be included in the itemization. The tax bill shall be easily understandable and include a notice pursuant to subsection (b).* * *Section 4. This act shall apply to taxable years beginning after December 31, 2025.Section 5. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2153PN2780 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627